Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-3510
Geology, defined.

Geology means the science which includes treatment of the earth and its origin and history, in general; investigation of the earth's constituent rocks, soils, minerals, solids, fluids including underground waters, gases, and other materials; the study of the natural agents, forces, and processes which cause changes in the earth or on its surface; and the application of this knowledge of the earth.

Laws 1998, LB 1161, § 58.